District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.06

Types of benefits.

(a)

The benefits provided under the health benefit plans shall include benefits for costs associated with care in a general hospital and for health services of a catastrophic nature and may include at a minimum the following benefits:

(1)

Hospital benefits;

(2)

Managed care;

(3)

Office visits;

(4)

Substance abuse;

(5)

Well baby care;

(6)

Prescription drugs;

(7)

Obstetrical benefits;

(8)

Mental health benefits; and

(9)

Hospice care.

(b)

Each contract issued under § 1-621.05 shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 31 of Title 31.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2106
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(d), 34 DCR 5079
Employees Health Benefits Program, self-financed coverage, see § 32-706.
This section is referenced in § 32-706.
1981 Ed., § 1-622.6.